Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4296.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 556. (1) Any An employer of labor in this state, employing both males and females, who shall not discriminate in any way in the payment of wages as between individuals of different sexes, religions, races, colors, national origins, ages, heights, weights, marital statuses, or other characteristics or attributes protected under the Elliot-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804, who are similarly employed. , shall be (2) A person that violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor . No female shall be assigned any task disproportionate to her strength, nor shall she be employed in any place detrimental to her morals, her health or her potential capacity for motherhood. Any punishable as follows: (a) If the person has 1 to 15 employees, a fine of not more than $5,000.00. (b) If the person has 16 to 50 employees, a fine of not more than $10,000.00. (c) If the person has more than 50 employees, a fine of not more than $20,000.00. (3) This section does not prohibit the person from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law arising out of the violation of this section. (4) A difference in wage rates based upon on a factor other than sex, shall religion, race, color, national origin, age, height, weight, marital status, or other characteristic or attribute protected under the Elliot-Larsen civil rights act, 1976 PA 453, MCL 37.2101 to 37.2804, does not violate this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.